Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.652

[Art. 83] Fraudulent enlistment, appointment, or separation.

Any person who:

(1) Procures his or her own enlistment or appointment in the organized militia by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to qualifications for that enlistment or appointment and receives pay or allowances thereunder; or

(2) Procures his or her own separation from the organized militia by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to eligibility for that separation;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

[ 1989 c 48 s 61; 1963 c 220 s 82.]